src/third-party/hunspell-dictionaries/lt.aff
SFX U Y 262
SFX U ti      t               ti        
SFX U ti      davau           ti        
SFX U ti      davai           ti        
SFX U ti      davo            ti        
SFX U ti      davome          ti        
SFX U ti      davom           ti        
SFX U ti      davote          ti        
SFX U ti      davot           ti        
SFX U tis     davausi         tis       
SFX U tis     davaisi         tis       
SFX U tis     davosi          tis       
SFX U tis     davom s         tis       
SFX U tis     davot s         tis       
SFX U ti      siu             ti        
SFX U ti      si              ti        
SFX U ti      s               ti        
SFX U  ti     us               ti       
SFX U yti     is              yti       
SFX U ti      sime            ti        
SFX U ti      sim             ti        
SFX U ti      site            ti        
SFX U ti      sit             ti        
SFX U ti      siuosi          tis       
SFX U ti      siesi           tis       
SFX U ti      sis             tis       
SFX U ti      sim s           tis       
SFX U ti      sit s           tis       
SFX U ti       iau            ti        
SFX U ti      tum             ti        
SFX U ti      tumei           ti        
SFX U ti      t               ti        
SFX U ti      tume            ti        
SFX U ti      tum me          ti        
SFX U ti      tum m           ti        
SFX U ti      tum te          ti        
SFX U ti      tum t           ti        
SFX U ti      tute            ti        
SFX U ti      tut             ti        
SFX U tis      iausi          tis       
SFX U tis     tumeis          tis       
SFX U tis     tumeisi         tis       
SFX U tis     t si            tis       
SFX U tis     tum s           tis       
SFX U tis     tum m s         tis       
SFX U tis     tum t s         tis       
SFX U tis     tut s           tis       
SFX U ti      k               ti        
SFX U ti      kime            ti        
SFX U ti      kim             ti        
SFX U ti      kite            ti        
SFX U ti      kit             ti        
SFX U tis     kis             tis       
SFX U tis     kim s           tis       
SFX U tis     kit s           tis       
SFX U ti      damas           ti        
SFX U ti      dama            ti        
SFX U ti      dami            ti        
SFX U ti      damos           ti        
SFX U tis     damasis         tis       
SFX U tis     damasi          tis       
SFX U tis     damiesi         tis       
SFX U tis     damosi          tis       
SFX U ti      davus           ti        
SFX U tis     davusis         tis       
SFX U ti      siantis         ti        
SFX U ti      dav s           ti        
SFX U ti      davusio         ti        
SFX U ti      davusiam        ti        
SFX U ti      davus           ti        
SFX U ti      davusiu         ti        
SFX U ti      davusiame       ti        
SFX U ti      dav             ti        
SFX U ti      davusi          ti        
SFX U ti      davusiems       ti        
SFX U ti      davusius        ti        
SFX U ti      davusiais       ti        
SFX U ti      davusiuose      ti        
SFX U ti      davusi          ti        
SFX U ti      davusios        ti        
SFX U ti      davusiai        ti        
SFX U ti      davusi          ti        
SFX U ti      davusia         ti        
SFX U ti      davusioje       ti        
SFX U ti      davusioj        ti        
SFX U ti      davusioms       ti        
SFX U ti      davusias        ti        
SFX U ti      davusiomis      ti        
SFX U ti      davusiose       ti        
SFX U ti      davusysis       ti        
SFX U ti      davusiojo       ti        
SFX U ti      davusiajam      ti        
SFX U ti      davus j         ti        
SFX U ti      davusiuoju      ti        
SFX U ti      davusiajame     ti        
SFX U ti      davusieji       ti        
SFX U ti      davusi j        ti        
SFX U ti      davusiesiems    ti        
SFX U ti      davusiuosius    ti        
SFX U ti      davusiaisiais   ti        
SFX U ti      davusiuosiuose  ti        
SFX U ti      davusioji       ti        
SFX U ti      davusiosios     ti        
SFX U ti      davusiajai      ti        
SFX U ti      davusi j        ti        
SFX U ti      davusi ja       ti        
SFX U ti      davusiojoje     ti        
SFX U ti      davusiojoj      ti        
SFX U ti      davusiosioms    ti        
SFX U ti      davusi sias     ti        
SFX U ti      davusiosiomis   ti        
SFX U ti      davusiosiose    ti        
SFX U ti      si s            ti        
SFX U ti      sian io         ti        
SFX U ti      sian iam        ti        
SFX U ti      siant           ti        
SFX U ti      sian iu         ti        
SFX U ti      sian iame       ti        
SFX U ti      si              ti        
SFX U ti      sian i          ti        
SFX U ti      siantiems       ti        
SFX U ti      sian ius        ti        
SFX U ti      sian iais       ti        
SFX U ti      sian iuose      ti        
SFX U ti      sianti          ti        
SFX U ti      sian ios        ti        
SFX U ti      sian iai        ti        
SFX U ti      sian i          ti        
SFX U ti      sian ia         ti        
SFX U ti      sian ioje       ti        
SFX U ti      sian ioj        ti        
SFX U ti      sian ioms       ti        
SFX U ti      sian ias        ti        
SFX U ti      sian iomis      ti        
SFX U ti      sian iose       ti        
SFX U ti      siantysis       ti        
SFX U ti      sian iojo       ti        
SFX U ti      sian iajam      ti        
SFX U ti      siant j         ti        
SFX U ti      sian iuoju      ti        
SFX U ti      sian iajame     ti        
SFX U ti      siantieji       ti        
SFX U ti      sian i j        ti        
SFX U ti      siantiesiems    ti        
SFX U ti      sian iuosius    ti        
SFX U ti      sian iaisiais   ti        
SFX U ti      sian iuosiuose  ti        
SFX U ti      sian ioji       ti        
SFX U ti      sian iosios     ti        
SFX U ti      sian iajai      ti        
SFX U ti      sian i j        ti        
SFX U ti      sian i ja       ti        
SFX U ti      sian iojoje     ti        
SFX U ti      sian iojoj      ti        
SFX U ti      sian iosioms    ti        
SFX U ti      sian i sias     ti        
SFX U ti      sian iosiomis   ti        
SFX U ti      sian iosiose    ti        
SFX U ti      tas             ti        
SFX U ti      to              ti        
SFX U ti      tam             ti        
SFX U ti      t               ti        
SFX U ti      tu              ti        
SFX U ti      tame            ti        
SFX U ti      ti              ti        
SFX U ti      tiems           ti        
SFX U ti      tus             ti        
SFX U ti      tais            ti        
SFX U ti      tuose           ti        
SFX U ti      ta              ti        
SFX U ti      tos             ti        
SFX U ti      tai             ti        
SFX U ti      toje            ti        
SFX U ti      toj             ti        
SFX U ti      toms            ti        
SFX U ti      tomis           ti        
SFX U ti      tose            ti        
SFX U ti      tasis           ti        
SFX U ti      tojo            ti        
SFX U ti      tajam           ti        
SFX U ti      t j             ti        
SFX U ti      tuoju           ti        
SFX U ti      tajame          ti        
SFX U ti      tieji           ti        
SFX U ti      t j             ti        
SFX U ti      tiesiems        ti        
SFX U ti      tuosius         ti        
SFX U ti      taisiais        ti        
SFX U ti      tuosiuose       ti        
SFX U ti      toji            ti        
SFX U ti      tosios          ti        
SFX U ti      tajai           ti        
SFX U ti      t j             ti        
SFX U ti      t ja            ti        
SFX U ti      tojoje          ti        
