src/third-party/hunspell-dictionaries/lt.dic
apib ti/NUX
apip ti/NUX
atkli ti/SUX
atsikli ti/SUX
bli ti/NUXik
b tis/IMNU
d i ti/NTUXacdefhijklpqrstuvw
gyti/NUXabcdefjklo
gytis/U
gri ti/NUXacdefghjkl
i lyti/SUX
i silyti/SUX
kli tis/IMU
lytis/IMU
nu  i ti/NUX
pap ti/ENUX
p ti/NUXacdefhik
ryti/NSUXbdeijkmqtvx
rytis/U
syti/NUXbk
sr ti/NUXfj
sul ti/NUX
trinti/NSTUXacdefhijklmopqrtuvwx
